Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.212

Local government retirees—Health care—Administration.

Employers providing access to health insurance coverage under chapter 319, Laws of 2002 may adopt criteria which specify allowable enrollment periods, require enrollees to keep current addresses and information, and outline other processes to ensure that plans can be administered efficiently and effectively.

[ 2002 c 319 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2002 c 319: See note following RCW 41.04.208.